District of Columbia statutes.
16-709

Executions on forfeited recognizances and judgments.

The Superior Court of the District of Columbia may issue execution on all recognizances forfeited in its criminal division, upon motion of the prosecuting officer; and all writs of fieri facias or other writs of execution on judgments issued by the criminal division shall be directed to and executed by the United States marshal.

History

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 559, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 557, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 145(d)(6)

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 16-709.
1973 Ed., § 16-709.